Colorado, session 2026A, SB024.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds that:
(a) The commercial use of unmanned aerial systems, referred to
in this section as "drones", in operations, including agriculture,
infrastructure, inspection, aerial surveying, news gathering, and disaster
relief, is already prevalent in the state and increasing;
(b) This use of commercial drones is expected to grow even
further as the federal government finalized beyond visual line of sight
-2- SB26-024

regulations;
(c) The federal government, through the federal aviation
administration, has the exclusive authority to regulate aviation safety and
use of airspace by aircraft, including drones, in the navigable airspace of
the United States and its regulations preempt state and local regulation of
those fields;
(d) The state and local governments of the state would benefit
from clarity concerning elements of drone use they can regulate;
(e) The expanding nature of commercial drone use places it
beyond the confines of local jurisdiction regulation;
(f) The avoidance of a patchwork of differing requirements is
required to prevent the hindrance of the development, introduction, or
deployment of drones or new drone technology in the state and the
inherent economic and social benefits arising from their use; and
(g) A drone operator may be in one local jurisdiction while the
drone is flying in another jurisdiction.
(2) Therefore, the general assembly declares that non-airspace
regulation of drones is a matter of statewide concern.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add article 7 to title
41 as follows:
ARTICLE 7
Unmanned Aircraft Systems Rights and Authorities Act
41-7-101. Short title.
THE SHORT TITLE OF THIS ARTICLE 7 IS THE "UNMANNED AIRCRAFT
SYSTEMS RIGHTS AND AUTHORITIES ACT".
41-7-102. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS ARTICLE 7, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
-3- SB26-024

REQUIRES:
(1) "OBSERVER" MEANS A PERSON THAT ASSISTS THE PERSON
MANIPULATING THE FLIGHT CONTROLS OF AN UNMANNED AIRCRAFT TO
MAINTAIN VISUAL LINE OF SIGHT WITH THE UNMANNED AIRCRAFT OR IN
AVOIDING OTHER AIR TRAFFIC, PERSONS, OR OBJECTS WITHIN THE
UNMANNED AIRCRAFT'S AREA OF OPERATION.
(2) (a) "POLITICAL SUBDIVISION" MEANS A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION
OF THIS STATE THAT HAS AUTHORITY TO SET BINDING POLICY ON PEOPLE
WITHIN THE SUBDIVISION'S JURISDICTION AND TO ENFORCE THE POLICY BY
IMPOSING PENALTIES FOR FAILING TO COMPLY WITH THE DUTIES IMPOSED
BY THE POLICY.
(b) "POLITICAL SUBDIVISION" INCLUDES THE GOVERNING BODY OF
THE POLITICAL SUBDIVISION, AN AGENCY OF THE POLITICAL SUBDIVISION,
OR AN AGENT OF THE POLITICAL SUBDIVISION.
(3) "UNMANNED AIRCRAFT" MEANS AN AIRCRAFT THAT IS
OPERATED WITHOUT THE POSSIBILITY OF DIRECT HUMAN INTERVENTION
RIDING ON THE AIRCRAFT OR FROM WITHIN THE AIRCRAFT.
(4) "UNMANNED AIRCRAFT SYSTEM" MEANS AN UNMANNED
AIRCRAFT AND ASSOCIATED ELEMENTS, INCLUDING COMMUNICATION
LINKS AND THE COMPONENTS THAT CONTROL THE UNMANNED AIRCRAFT,
THAT ARE REQUIRED FOR THE PILOT IN COMMAND TO OPERATE SAFELY
AND EFFICIENTLY IN THE NATIONAL AIRSPACE SYSTEM.
41-7-103. Federal authority over airspace.
THIS ARTICLE 7 DOES NOT PREEMPT OR AFFECT THE EXCLUSIVE
SOVEREIGNTY OF AIRSPACE OF THE UNITED STATES AS SET FORTH IN 49
U.S.C. SEC. 40103 AND ANY OTHER RELEVANT FEDERAL LAW. A COURT,
STATE AGENCY, OR POLITICAL SUBDIVISION SHALL NOT INTERPRET OR
-4- SB26-024

APPLY THIS ARTICLE 7 IN A MANNER THAT CONTRADICTS THE EXCLUSIVE
AUTHORITY OF THE UNITED STATES GOVERNMENT TO REGULATE THE
OPERATION OF UNMANNED AIRCRAFT AND UNMANNED AIRCRAFT SYSTEMS
IN THE AIRSPACE OF THE UNITED STATES.
41-7-104. Individual and commercial rights.
(1) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY OPERATE AN UNMANNED AIRCRAFT
SYSTEM FOR RECREATIONAL PURPOSES WITHIN THIS STATE IF THE
UNMANNED AIRCRAFT IS OPERATED IN COMPLIANCE WITH STATE LAW AND
FEDERAL LAW.
(2) A PERSON MAY OPERATE AN UNMANNED AIRCRAFT SYSTEM FOR
COMMERCIAL PURPOSES WITHIN THIS STATE IF:
(a) THE PERSON IS DOING BUSINESS LAWFULLY WITHIN THIS STATE;
AND
(b) THE UNMANNED AIRCRAFT SYSTEM IS OPERATED OR USED IN
COMPLIANCE WITH STATE LAW AND FEDERAL LAW.
(3) THE STATE OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE SHALL
NOT REQUIRE THE OWNER OF AN UNMANNED AIRCRAFT OR UNMANNED
AIRCRAFT SYSTEM TO REGISTER AN UNMANNED AIRCRAFT OR UNMANNED
AIRCRAFT SYSTEM BEYOND WHAT MAY BE REQUIRED BY THE REGULATION
OF THE FEDERAL AVIATION ADMINISTRATION.
(4) THE OPERATION OF AN UNMANNED AIRCRAFT SYSTEM IN
COMPLIANCE WITH FEDERAL LAW IN AIRSPACE OVER THIS STATE DOES NOT,
STANDING ALONE, GIVE RISE TO LEGAL LIABILITY UNDER THE LAWS OF THIS
STATE OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE.
41-7-105. Regulatory authority of state agencies.
(1) THE STATE, IF ACTING THROUGH A DULY ADOPTED AND
ENFORCEABLE STATUTE, RULE, ORDER, OR CONTRACT, MAY:
-5- SB26-024

(a) PROVIDE FOR THE OPERATION OF AN UNMANNED AIRCRAFT
SYSTEM:
(I) BY OR ON BEHALF OF THE STATE; OR
(II) THAT IS OWNED BY THE STATE; OR
(b) PROVIDE FOR OR PROHIBIT:
(I) THE LAUNCH OF AN UNMANNED AIRCRAFT FROM PROPERTY
OWNED BY THE STATE;
(II) THE INTENTIONAL LANDING OF AN UNMANNED AIRCRAFT ONTO
PROPERTY OWNED BY THE STATE; OR
(III) THE PRESENCE OF A PILOT ACTIVELY IN COMMAND OF AN
UNMANNED AIRCRAFT SYSTEM ON PROPERTY OWNED BY THE STATE.
41-7-106. Regulatory authority of political subdivisions.
(1) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION, A POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION SHALL NOT ENACT OR ENFORCE A RESOLUTION OR
ORDINANCE THAT GOVERNS THE FOLLOWING FOR AN UNMANNED AIRCRAFT
SYSTEM:
(a) OWNERSHIP; OPERATION, INCLUDING AIRSPACE, ALTITUDE, OR
FLIGHT PATHS; DESIGN; MANUFACTURE; TESTING; MAINTENANCE;
LICENSING; REGISTRATION; CERTIFICATION; OR EQUIPMENT
REQUIREMENTS; OR
(b) QUALIFICATIONS, TRAINING, OR CERTIFICATION OF A PILOT,
OPERATOR, OR OBSERVER.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT LIMIT THE AUTHORITY OF A POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION TO:
(a) ADOPT OR ENFORCE A RESOLUTION, ORDINANCE, OR CONTRACT
THAT GOVERNS THE OPERATION OF AN UNMANNED AIRCRAFT SYSTEM:
(I) BY OR ON BEHALF OF THE POLITICAL SUBDIVISION; OR
-6- SB26-024

(II) THAT IS OWNED BY THE POLITICAL SUBDIVISION;
(b) ADOPT OR ENFORCE A GENERALLY APPLICABLE RESOLUTION OR
ORDINANCE THAT RELATES TO ILLEGAL ACTS IF THE RESOLUTION OR
ORDINANCE DOES NOT SPECIFICALLY GOVERN THE USE OF AN UNMANNED
AIRCRAFT SYSTEM FOR THOSE ILLEGAL ACTS, NOTWITHSTANDING THE
RESOLUTION OR ORDINANCE MAY APPLY TO THE USE OF UNMANNED
AIRCRAFT SYSTEMS; OR
(c) ADOPT OR ENFORCE A RESOLUTION, ORDINANCE, OR CONTRACT
THAT REGULATES:
(I) THE LAUNCH OF AN UNMANNED AIRCRAFT FROM PROPERTY
OWNED BY THE POLITICAL SUBDIVISION;
(II) THE INTENTIONAL LANDING OF AN UNMANNED AIRCRAFT ONTO
PROPERTY OWNED BY THE POLITICAL SUBDIVISION; OR
(III) THE PRESENCE OF A PILOT ACTIVELY IN COMMAND OF AN
UNMANNED AIRCRAFT SYSTEM ON PROPERTY OWNED BY THE POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION.
(3) A RESOLUTION OR ORDINANCE THAT VIOLATES THIS SECTION,
WHETHER ENACTED OR ADOPTED BY A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION BEFORE OR
AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS ARTICLE 7, IS VOID.
41-7-107. Applicability and other law.
(1) THIS ARTICLE 7 DOES NOT PROHIBIT:
(a) THE TAKEOFF OR LANDING OF AN UNMANNED AIRCRAFT AS
DEEMED REASONABLE OR NECESSARY BY PRIVATE OR PUBLIC PERSONS FOR
BONA FIDE EMERGENCY OR MAINTENANCE SUPPORT FUNCTIONS OR
SERVICES, INCLUDING THE PROTECTION AND MAINTENANCE OF PUBLIC OR
PRIVATE CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE;
(b) IN COMPLIANCE WITH FEDERAL AVIATION ADMINISTRATION
-7- SB26-024

REGULATIONS, THE LANDING OF AN UNMANNED AIRCRAFT AS DEEMED
REASONABLE OR NECESSARY BY THE OPERATOR IN THE EVENT OF A
TECHNICAL MALFUNCTION OF AN UNMANNED AIRCRAFT SYSTEM;
(c) THE TAKEOFF OR LANDING OF AN UNMANNED AIRCRAFT BEING
OPERATED BY A PEACE OFFICER IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THE OFFICER'S
DUTIES; OR
(d) THE TAKEOFF OR LANDING OF AN UNMANNED AIRCRAFT OWNED
OR OPERATED BY THE UNITED STATES GOVERNMENT, OR AN OPERATOR
UNDER CONTRACT WITH AN AGENCY OF THE UNITED STATES
GOVERNMENT, IN PERFORMANCE OF THE OPERATOR'S ASSIGNED DUTIES.
(2) THIS ARTICLE 7 DOES NOT PERMIT STATE OR POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION REGULATION OF UNMANNED AIRCRAFT OPERATIONS IN
NAVIGABLE AIRSPACE OVER LAND OWNED BY THE STATE OR A POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to:
(a) Acts committed on or after the applicable effective date of this
act; or
-8- SB26-024

(b) Ordinances, resolutions, and rules existing on or after the
applicable effective date of this act.
-9- SB26-024